Connecticut, session 2026, SB00482.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17b-8 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Social Services shall submit an application
for a federal waiver or renewal of such waiver of any assistance program
requirements, except such application pertaining to routine operational
issues, and any proposed amendment to the Medicaid state plan to
make a change in program requirements that would have required a
waiver were it not for the passage of the Patient Protection and
Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, and the Health Care and Education
Reconciliation Act of 2010, P.L. 111-152 to the joint standing committees
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
human services and appropriations and the budgets of state agencies,
and, for the waiver application required under section 17b-312, the joint
SB482 / File No. 482 1

SB482 File No. 482
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to insurance, prior to the submission of such application
or proposed amendment to the federal government. Not later than thirty
days after the date of their receipt of such application or proposed
amendment, the joint standing committees shall: (1) Hold a public
hearing on the waiver application, or (2) in the case of a proposed
amendment to the Medicaid state plan, notify the Commissioner of
Social Services whether or not said joint standing committees intend to
hold a public hearing. Any notice to the commissioner indicating that
the joint standing committees intend to hold a public hearing on a
proposed amendment to the Medicaid state plan shall state the date on
which the joint standing committees intend to hold such public hearing,
which shall not be later than sixty days after the joint standing
committees' receipt of the proposed amendment. At the conclusion of a
public hearing held in accordance with the provisions of this section, the
joint standing committees shall advise the commissioner of their
approval, denial or modifications, if any, of the commissioner's waiver
application or proposed amendment. If the joint standing committees
advise the commissioner of their denial of the commissioner's waiver
application or proposed amendment, the commissioner shall not submit
the application for a federal waiver or proposed amendment to the
federal government. If such committees do not concur, the committee
chairpersons shall appoint a committee of conference which shall be
composed of three members from each joint standing committee. At
least one member appointed from each joint standing committee shall
be a member of the minority party. The report of the committee of
conference shall be made to each joint standing committee, which shall
vote to accept or reject the report. The report of the committee of
conference may not be amended. If a joint standing committee rejects
the report of the committee of conference, that joint standing committee
shall notify the commissioner of the rejection and the commissioner's
waiver application or proposed amendment shall be deemed approved.
If the joint standing committees accept the report, the committee having
cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
agencies shall advise the commissioner of their approval, denial or
SB482 / File No. 482 2

SB482 File No. 482
modifications, if any, of the commissioner's waiver application or
proposed amendment. If the joint standing committees do not so advise
the commissioner during the thirty-day period, the waiver application
or proposed amendment shall be deemed approved. Any application
for a federal waiver, waiver renewal or proposed amendment submitted
to the federal government by the commissioner, pursuant to this section,
shall be in accordance with the approval or modifications, if any, of the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to human services and appropriations and the
budgets of state agencies, and, for the waiver application required under
section 17b-312, the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to insurance.
(b) The Commissioner of Social Services shall annually, not later than
December fifteenth, notify the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and
the budgets of state agencies and the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services of potential Medicaid waivers and amendments to the
Medicaid state plan that may result in a cost savings for the state. The
commissioner shall notify the committees of the possibility of any
Medicaid waiver application or proposed amendment to the Medicaid
state plan that the commissioner is considering in developing a budget
for the next fiscal year or any other application subject to the provisions
of subsection (e) of this section before the commissioner submits such
budget for legislative approval.
(c) Thirty days prior to submission of an application for a waiver from
federal law, renewal of such waiver or proposed amendment to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly under subsection (a) of
this section, the Commissioner of Social Services shall publish a notice
that the commissioner intends to seek such a waiver or waiver renewal,
or submit a proposed amendment to the federal government in the
Connecticut Law Journal and on the Department of Social Services'
Internet web site, along with a summary of the provisions of the waiver
application or the proposed amendment and the manner in which
SB482 / File No. 482 3

SB482 File No. 482
individuals may submit comments. The commissioner shall allow thirty
days for written comments on the waiver application or proposed
amendment prior to submission of the application for a waiver, waiver
renewal or proposed amendment to the General Assembly under
subsection (a) of this section and shall include all written comments with
the waiver, waiver renewal application or proposed amendment in the
submission to the General Assembly.
(d) The commissioner shall include with any waiver application or
proposed amendment submitted to the federal government pursuant to
this section: (1) Any written comments received pursuant to subsection
(c) of this section; and (2) any additional written comments submitted
to the joint standing committees at such proceedings. The joint standing
committees shall transmit any such materials to the commissioner for
inclusion with any such waiver application or proposed amendment.
(e) Except for federal block grant applications subject to the
provisions of section 4-28b, in addition to applications submitted to the
federal government for Medicaid waivers and Medicaid state plan
100 amendments, the Commissioner of Social Services shall submit any
101 application for or related to federal funding for programs administered
102 by the commissioner to the joint standing committees of the General
103 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and
104 the budgets of state agencies and human services not later than thirty
105 days before submission to the federal government. Said committees
106 may hold a hearing and schedule a vote on such application in
107 accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-8
HS Joint Favorable
SB482 / File No. 482 4

SB482 File No. 482
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. Various See Below See Below
Note: Various=General Fund and Federal Funds
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
This bill requires the Department of Social Services (DSS) to submit
any federal funding applications for DSS-administered programs to the
Appropriations and Human Services committees at least 30 days before
submitting them to the federal government, excluding federal block
grant applications and the Community Services Block Grant.
To the extent this delays or modifies funding that DSS would have
otherwise received, the state could experience a fiscal impact that cannot
be determined at this time.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to certain federal grant opportunities
and related committee actions.
SB482 / File No. 482 5

SB482 File No. 482
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 482
AN ACT CONCERNING LEGISLATIVE OVERSIGHT OF MEDICAID
WAIVERS, MEDICAID STATE PLAN AMENDMENTS AND OTHER
FEDERALLY FUNDED PROGRAMS.